New Jersey, session 221, A2449.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall establish a program for the training of planned real estate development association members who are elected to serve on the executive boards of associations.  At least three hours of training shall be mandatory on the part of a board member, which shall be completed no later than 180 days following the beginning of the term of office of the member.  The program shall provide information and guidance on all of the matters relevant and necessary to most effectively enable a board member to perform the members duties, and shall include good business practices, model record keeping procedures, legal requirements for boards, the making of a budget and maintaining reserve accounts, information on various State entities available to assist the board, and any other information the commissioner deems relevant.  The commissioner shall have the authority to remove a board member who does not complete the training required pursuant to this section.  The requirements of this section shall apply to the first term of office of an executive board member that commences following the effective date of this section. b.  The commissioner shall adopt the regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) on or before the first day of the fifth month next following enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the fifth month next following enactment.